Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.074

Department of health—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of health to any deputy secretary, assistant secretary, or person who administers the necessary divisions, offices, bureaus, and programs and five additional positions involved in policy or program direction.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 813.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.